Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-616
Board of directors; oath.

Before entering upon the duties of his office, every member elected to membership on the board of directors shall take and subscribe to an oath to support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Nebraska, and faithfully and impartially to perform the duties of his office, which oath shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 4, p. 344;

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 4, p. 581;

Laws 1941, c. 137, § 1, p. 542;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-704;

Laws 1943, c. 145, § 1(8), p. 515;

Laws 1943, c. 146, § 1, p. 516;

R.S.1943, § 70-616.